Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,344
Snowmobile owner; prohibited acts.

It shall be unlawful for the owner of a snowmobile to permit such snowmobile to be operated contrary to the provisions of sections 60-6,320 to 60-6,346 or for purposes of carrying a shotgun or rifle thereon unless such shotgun or rifle is unloaded and encased.

Laws 1971, LB 330, § 19;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2019;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 438.